Utah statutes.
53A-3-404.   Annual financial report -- Audit report.
(1)  The annual financial report of each school district, containing items
required by law or by the State Board of Education and attested to by
independent auditors, shall be prepared as required by Section 51-2a-201.
(2) If auditors are employed under Section 51-2a-201, the auditors shall
complete their field work in sufficient time to allow them to verify necessary
audit adjustments included in the annual financial report to the state
superintendent.
(3) (a) (i)  The district shall forward the annual financial report to the
state superintendent not later than October 1.
(ii)  The report shall include information to enable the state superintendent
to complete the statement required under Subsection 53A-1-301(3)(d)(v).
(b)  The State Board of Education shall publish electronically a copy of the
report on the Internet not later than December 15.
(4)  The completed audit report shall be delivered to the school district
board of education and the state superintendent of public instruction not
later than November 30 of each year.
